Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2 D EEP DRILLING FOR OIL, GAS, AND OTHER MINERALS
12-4-48. Actions by director to enforce part; civil penalties; effect of Code section on cause of action by royalty owners, lienholders, or other claimants.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person is violating the provisions of this part or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part, the director may issue an administrative order to that person. The order shall specify the provisions of this part alleged to have been violated and shall order that corrective action be taken within a reasonable period of time prescribed in the order. Any such order shall become final and enforceable unless the person or persons named therein request in writing a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board no later than 30 days after the issuance of the order.

Whenever the director finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public interest, the director may issue a provisional order reciting the existence of such an emergency and requiring that such action be taken as is reasonably necessary to meet the emergency under the circumstances, provided that such an emergency order shall be issued only after an affidavit has been filed with the director showing specific facts of such an emergency condition. Such order shall be effective immediately. Any person against whom such order is directed shall upon appropriate notice comply therewith immediately but on application to the director shall be afforded a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board within ten days of receipt of such application by the director or, if the party applying so requests, within 48 hours of receipt of such application by the director. Prior to such hearing, the director shall be authorized to modify or revoke such order. After the hearing, the administrative law judge shall be authorized to make such order as is just and reasonable, including an order continuing, revoking, or modifying such provisional order.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person is violating any provision of this part or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part, the director may bring an action against such person in the proper superior court to restrain such person or persons from continuing such violations. In such action, the director may seek injunctions, including temporary restraining orders and temporary injunctions, without the necessity for showing lack of an adequate remedy at law.

Any person who willfully or negligently violates any provision of this part, any rule or regulation adopted under this part, or any permit or final or emergency order of the director shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $50.00, but in any event not to exceed $10,000.00 for each act of violation. Each day of continued violation shall subject such person to a separate civil penalty. An administrative law judge appointed by the board, after a hearing shall determine whether or not any person has violated any provision of this part or any rule or regulation adopted under this part or any permit or final or emergency order of the director, and shall upon proper finding issue an order imposing such civil penalties as provided in this Code section. Any person so penalized under this Code section is entitled to judicial review. In this connection, all hearings and proceedings for judicial review under this Code section shall be in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act." All civil penalties recovered by the director as provided by this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

In addition to any other enforcement remedy available to the director under this part, all illegal minerals and illegal products are declared to be contraband and forfeited to the state in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9, except that:

Any seizure of contraband shall be delivered to the director or his or her duly authorized agent;

Illegal minerals shall only be forfeited as provided for in Code Section 9-16-12; and

Property seized pursuant to this subsection shall not be required to be stored in an area within the jurisdiction of the court if such storage is not possible.

Nothing in this Code section shall deny or abridge any cause of action a royalty owner, lienholder, or other claimant may have against any persons whose acts result in the forfeiture of the illegal oil, illegal gas, or illegal product.

(Ga. L. 1945, p. 366, §§ 17, 19, 21, 22; Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 10; Ga. L. 1976, p. 544, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 398, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-9/HB 233; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

12-4-49. Applicability of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act."

In the administration and enforcement of this part, all hearings before an administrative law judge shall be subject to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act." Any party to said hearings (including the director) shall have the right of judicial review in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 11; Ga. L. 1984, p. 398, § 7; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

12-4-50. Obedience to subpoena required; self-incrimination not a defense; use of evidence in criminal prosecutions.

In any contested administrative hearing under this part, no person shall be excused from attending and testifying, or from producing books, papers, and records before the administrative law judge, or from obedience to the subpoena of the administrative law judge, on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required by him or her may tend to incriminate him or her or subject him or her to a penalty or forfeiture, provided that nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed as requiring any person to produce any books, papers, or records, or to testify in response to any inquiry, not pertinent to a question lawfully before the administrative law judge for determination. No evidence given by or required of any natural person shall be used or admitted against such a person in any criminal prosecution for any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or she may be required to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before the administrative law judge in obedience to the subpoena; provided, however, that no person testifying shall be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

(Ga. L. 1945, p. 366, § 13; Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 12; Ga. L. 1976, p. 544, § 9; Ga. L. 1984, p. 398, § 8; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 12/SB 52.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted "obedience to the subpoena" for "obedience to its subpoena" in the last sentence.

12-4-51. Effect of part on other laws.

Any provision of Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 5 of this title which is inconsistent with this part shall not be repealed by this part and shall govern over this part.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 398, § 9; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 12; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

12-4-52. Effect of part on authority and functions of other state officers and agencies.

This part shall not be construed as limiting the authority or functions of any officer or agency of this state under any other law or regulation not inconsistent with this part.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 14; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

12-4-52.1. Local authority.

This part shall not be construed as limiting the authority of local governments to adopt local zoning or land use ordinances limiting the location or timing of activities defined herein for the purposes of protecting natural resources or human health and welfare.

(Code 1981, §

12-4-52.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

12-4-53. Prohibited acts.

The following activities are prohibited:

The waste of oil or gas as defined in this part;

The sale, purchase, or acquisition or the transportation, refining, processing, or handling of illegal minerals or illegal products;

The sale, purchase, or acquisition or the transportation, refining, processing, or handling in any other way of any mineral, including oil and gas, or any mineral product without complying with this part or any rule or regulation of the board promulgated pursuant to this part;

Intentionally or negligently permitting any gas or oil well to get out of control;

The drilling of any well covered by the provisions of this part by any person without a permit for such drilling; and

Any other violation of any provision of this part or any rule or regulation promulgated under this part.

(Ga. L. 1945, p. 366, §§ 9, 20, 25; Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 8; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

12-4-54. Levying of severance tax.

As used in this Code section, the term "extractor" means any person removing oil or gas from the ground pursuant to this part.

A severance tax shall be levied on oil or gas removed from the ground in this state by an extractor as follows:

Three cents per barrel of oil; and

One cent per thousand cubic feet of gas.

The Department of Revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this subsection and shall promulgate and make available forms for the use of extractors to assist in compliance with this subsection.

In addition to the tax provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section, the governing authority of each county and each municipal corporation is authorized to provide by local ordinance or resolution for the levy, assessment, and collection of a severance tax on oil or gas removed from the ground by an extractor within the jurisdiction of such county or municipality as follows:

An amount not to exceed nine cents per barrel of oil; and

An amount not to exceed two cents per thousand cubic feet of gas.

The severance tax provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be collected by the Department of Revenue in the same manner and under the same procedures as provided for pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section on behalf of each county and municipality electing to exercise the powers conferred herein and shall be remitted to each such county and municipality accordingly.

(Code 1981, §

12-4-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)